Utah statutes.
31A-15-109.   Investigation and disclosure of insurance contracts.
Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that insurance has been
effectuated by or for any person in Utah with an unauthorized insurer, the
commissioner may, in writing, order the person to produce for examination all
insurance contracts and other documents evidencing insurance with both
authorized and unauthorized insurers and to disclose to the commissioner the
amount of insurance, the name and address of each insurer, the gross amount of
premium, and the name and address of any person who has assisted in effecting
the insurance.
